Tennessee, session 114, SB0013.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-86-302(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "The board shall be composed of nine (9) members" and substituting "The board shall
be composed of eleven (11) members".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-86-302(b)(1), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (C) and (D) and substituting:
(C) Two (2) representatives of county government, appointed by the speaker of
the senate;
(D) Two (2) representatives of city government, appointed by the speaker of the
house of representatives;
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-86-302(h), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
A quorum shall consist of six (6) or more members, and all official action of the
board requires a quorum.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0013
000217
- 1 -